Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201579-2507
School district; inform nonpublic school of potential participation.

A school district participating in an expanded learning opportunity program shall inform an authorized representative or designee of each nonpublic school geographically located within each public school building's attendance area regarding potential participation in an expanded learning opportunity program.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 21.
August 30, 2015